Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-610
Impersonating a peace officer; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of impersonating a peace officer if he or she falsely pretends to be a peace officer and performs any act in that pretended capacity.

(2) Impersonating a peace officer is a Class IV felony.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 132;

Laws 2026, LB965, § 17.
October 1, 2026